Hawaii statutes.
[§461J-7.5] Physical therapist assistant
license without necessity of examination. Any applicant who submits proof
of graduation from an accredited physical therapist assistant program or an
accredited physical therapy program recognized by the United States Department
of Education, and five years of work experience as a physical therapist
assistant by December 31, 2014, may be licensed as a physical therapist
assistant under this chapter without the necessity of examination. [L 2013, c
220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next